South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S437.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-1-130. The following employees shall be exempt from the provisions of Article 5, Chapter 17, Title 8 of the South Carolina Code of Laws: (A) employees who report directly to a constitutional officer or report directly to a person who reports directly to a constitutional office in the Offices of the Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Comptroller General, Superintendent of Education, Adjutant General, or the Commissioner of Agriculture; and (B) management employees who report directly to the agency head or report directly to a person who reports directly to the agency head of the Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Services, the Department of Commerce, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Insurance, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation, the Department of Parks, Recreation and Tourism, the Department of Probation, Parole, and Pardon Services, the Department of Revenue, the Department of Social Services, the State Law Enforcement Division, the Department of Motor Vehicles, or the Department of Public Safety. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----